Illinois, session 104th, SB3240.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 5Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2MMMM as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 505/2MMMM new)7    Sec. 2MMMM. Customer support service. 8    (a) As used in this Section, "high-impact social media 9company" means an entity that generates at least 10$3,000,000,000 in annual revenue and provides any 11Internet-accessible platform that:12        (1) has 300,000,000 or more monthly active users for 13    not fewer than 3 of the preceding 12 months; and14        (2) constitutes an online product or service that is 15    primarily used by users to access or share user-generated 16    content. 17    "High-impact social media company" does not include any 18online product or service that:19        (1) exclusively provides electronic mail or direct 20    messaging services; or21        (2) primarily consists of news, sports, entertainment, 22    interactive video games, electronic commerce, or content 23    that is preselected by the provider for which any chat,   SB3240- 2 -LRB104 18750 SPS 32193 b1    comments, or interactive functionality is incidental to, 2    directly related to, or dependent on the provision of that 3    content.4    (b) It is an unlawful practice within the meaning of this 5Act for a high-impact social media company in this State to 6fail to make available to its customers, at no cost, a customer 7support service for customers to notify the company of any 8harmful content that the customer believes is illegal or 9violates the high-impact social media company's terms of 10service. The customer support service must timely respond to 11customers within one business day after a customer initially 12contacts the company. The customer support service must take 13active steps to resolve the customer's issue or complaint and 14communicate the steps taken to resolve the issue or complaint 15with the customer by mail, telephone, or email, as requested 16by the customer, within 3 business days after a customer 17initially contacts the company. The customer support service 18shall communicate with the customer at least once every 3 19business days until the issue has been resolved or until the 20issue has been determined to be unsolvable.21    (c) The Attorney General may bring an action against a 22high-impact social media company that does not comply with 23this Section. Any company that violates this Section shall be 24fined $1,000 per day per violation. Fines collected under this 25Section shall be deposited into a fund to support mental 26health awareness in Illinois.   SB3240- 3 -LRB104 18750 SPS 32193 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 21, 2027.